North Carolina statutes. Chapter 117. Electrification.
Article 6. Indemnification.

§ 117-46.
Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, or agents.

The powers, authority and requirements as to indemnification, payment of expenses, and purchase of liability insurance for directors, officers, employees and agents, as set out in G.S. 55A-17.1, 55A-17.2 and G.S. 55A-17.3 shall apply to and may be exercised by any corporation formed under this Chapter. The indemnification of a director, officer, employee or agent of a corporation provided by this section shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which such director, officer, employee or agent may be entitled, under any bylaw, agreement, vote of board of directors or members, or otherwise with respect to any liability or litigation expenses arising out of his activities as director, officer, employee, or agent.

History.

1987, c. 107, s. 1.